Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-7203
Act, how construed.

The Uniform Determination of Death Act shall be applied and construed to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of the act among states enacting it.

Laws 1992, LB 906, § 3.